apertium-azz.azz.lexc
LEXICON AGR-SUBJ-SIO

%<s_sg1%>:ni%>                                     AGR-SUBJ-FLAGS ;
%<s_sg2%>:ti%>                                     AGR-SUBJ-FLAGS ;
%<s_sg3%>:0%>                                      AGR-SUBJ-FLAGS ;
%<s_pl1%>:ti%>                                     AGR-SUBJ-FLAGS-PLUR ;
%<s_pl2%>:nan%>                                    AGR-SUBJ-FLAGS-PLUR ;
%<s_pl3%>:0%>                                      AGR-SUBJ-FLAGS-PLUR ;
%<s_ind%>:se%>                                     AGR-SUBJ-FLAGS ;

LEXICON AGR-SUBJ-FLAGS-PLUR

@P.PLUR.1@:@P.PLUR.1@                              AGR-SUBJ-FLAGS ;

LEXICON AGR-SUBJ-FLAGS

@P.SUBJ.1@:@P.SUBJ.1@                              AGR-OBJ-SO ; 
@P.SUBJ.1@:@P.SUBJ.1@                              AGR-OBJ-SI ; 
@P.SUBJ.1@:@P.SUBJ.1@                              INCORP-ADV ; 

!LEXICON AGR-SUBJ-NV
!
!%<s_sg1%>:ni%>                                     # ;
!%<s_sg2%>:ti%>                                     # ;
!%<s_sg3%>:0%>                                      # ;
!%<s_pl1%>:ti%>                                     # ;
!%<s_pl2%>:nan%>                                    # ;
!%<s_pl3%>:0%>                                      # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON AGR-OBJ-SI

%<i_sg1%>:nech%>                                   AGR-OBJ-SI-FLAGS ;
%<i_sg2%>:mits%>                                   AGR-OBJ-SI-FLAGS ;
%<i_sg2%>%<hon%>:mits%>on%>                        AGR-OBJ-SI-FLAGS ;
%<i_sg3%>:k%{i%}%>                                 AGR-OBJ-SI-FLAGS ;
%<i_pl1%>:tech%>                                   AGR-OBJ-SI-FLAGS ;
%<i_pl2%>:namech%>                                 AGR-OBJ-SI-FLAGS ;
%<i_pl3%>:ki%{N%}%>                                AGR-OBJ-SI-FLAGS ;
                                                   AGR-REFL ;

LEXICON AGR-OBJ-SI-FLAGS

@P.IOBJ.1@:@P.IOBJ.1@                              AGR-IOBJ-SIO ;

LEXICON AGR-OBJ-SO

%<o_sg1%>:nech%>                                   AGR-OBJ-SO-FLAGS ;
%<o_sg2%>:mits%>                                   AGR-OBJ-SO-FLAGS ;
%<o_sg2%>%<hon%>:mits%>on%>                        AGR-OBJ-SO-FLAGS ;
%<o_sg3%>:k%{i%}%>                                 AGR-OBJ-SO-FLAGS ;
%<o_pl1%>:tech%>                                   AGR-OBJ-SO-FLAGS ;
%<o_pl2%>:namech%>                                 AGR-OBJ-SO-FLAGS ;
%<o_pl3%>:ki%{N%}%>                                AGR-OBJ-SO-FLAGS ;
                                                   AGR-REFL ;

LEXICON AGR-OBJ-SO-FLAGS 
 
@P.OBJ.1@:@P.OBJ.1@                                INCORP-ADV ;

LEXICON AGR-REFL 

@P.IOBJ.1@%<i_ref%>:@P.IOBJ.1@m%{o%}%>             AGR-IOBJ-SIO ;
@P.OBJ.1@%<o_ref%>:@P.OBJ.1@m%{o%}%>               INCORP-ADV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
! ni-mits-in-maka-s

LEXICON AGR-IOBJ-SIO

%<o_sg3%>:                                         AGR-OBJ-SIO-FLAGS  ; 
%<o_pl3%>:i%{N%}%>                                 AGR-OBJ-SIO-FLAGS  ; 
                                                   INCORP-ADV ;
LEXICON AGR-OBJ-SIO-FLAGS

@P.OBJ.1@:@P.OBJ.1@                                INCORP-ADV ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON INCORP-ADV

%<yek%>:%{y%}ek%>                                  INCORP-DIR ;
%<tel%>:tel%>                                      INCORP-DIR ;
%<pan%>:pa%>                                       INCORP-DIR ;
%<pan%>:pa%{N%}%>                                  INCORP-DIR ;
%<sen%>:se%{N%}%>                                  INCORP-DIR ;
%<nal%>:nal%>                                      INCORP-DIR ;
                                                   INCORP-DIR ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON INCORP-DIR

%<hon%>:on%>                                        INCORP-DIR-FLAGS ;
%<hual%>:hual%>                                    INCORP-DIR-FLAGS ;
                                                   INCORP-DIR-FLAGS ;

LEXICON INCORP-DIR-FLAGS 

@D.OBJ@:@D.OBJ@                                    INCORP-INDEF ;
@D.OBJ@:@D.OBJ@                                    INCORP-NOMINAL ;
                                                   BASES ; 
                                                   

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON INCORP-INDEF

%<o_nn%>:ta%>                                      INCORP-INDEF-FLAGS ;
%<o_aa%>:te%>                                      INCORP-INDEF-FLAGS ;
                                                   INCORP-NOMINAL ;

LEXICON INCORP-INDEF-FLAGS 

@P.OBJ.1@:@P.OBJ.1@                                BASES ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON INCORP-NOMINAL

%<incorp%>%{»%}:0%{»%}%>                           INCORP-NOMINAL-FLAGS ; 

LEXICON INCORP-NOMINAL-FLAGS 

@P.OBJ.1@:@P.OBJ.1@                                BASES ; 

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V-SIO-PRES 

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>:                               V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pp%>:%>ni                             V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-SIO-PRET

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pret%>:%{j%}%>%{k%}                   V-AGR-PRET ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<plu%>:%{j%}%>ka                       V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-SIO-IMPF

%<v%>%<tv%>%<impf%>:%>ya                           V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-SIO-PROG

%<v%>%<tv%>%<prog%>%<pres%>:%{j%}%>to%>k           V-AGR-PRET ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<prog%>%<fut%>:%{j%}%>to%>s            V-AGR-FUTR;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<prog%>%<cni%>:%{j%}%>to%>s%>ki%{y%}a  V-AGR-PRES;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<prog%>%<impf%>:%{j%}%>to%>ya          V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<tv%>:%{j%}%>t                               V-AUX-II ;

%<v%>%<tv%>:                                       V-DIR ;


LEXICON V-SIO-FUTR

%<v%>%<tv%>%<fut%>:%>s                             V-AGR-FUTR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<fut%>:%>s                             V-AUX-I ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<cni%>:%>s%>kia                        V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<cnt%>:%>ni                            V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<opt%>:                                V-AGR-OPT ;
! %<v%>%<tv%>:                                       V-DIR ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V-SO-PRES 

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>:                               V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pp%>:%>ni                             V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-SO-PRET

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pret%>:%{j%}%>%{k%}                   V-AGR-PRET ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<plu%>:%{j%}%>ka                       V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-SO-IMPF

%<v%>%<tv%>%<impf%>:%>ya                           V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-SO-PROG

%<v%>%<tv%>%<prog%>%<pres%>:%{j%}%>to%>k           V-AGR-PRET ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<prog%>%<fut%>:%{j%}%>to%>s            V-AGR-FUTR;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<prog%>%<cni%>:%{j%}%>to%>s%>ki%{y%}a  V-AGR-PRES;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<prog%>%<impf%>:%{j%}%>to%>ya          V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<tv%>:%{j%}%>t                               V-AUX-II ;

%<v%>%<tv%>:                                       V-DIR ;


LEXICON V-SO-FUTR

%<v%>%<tv%>%<fut%>:%>s                             V-AGR-FUTR ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<fut%>:%>s                             V-AUX-I ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<cni%>:%>s%>kia                        V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<cnt%>:%>ni                            V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<opt%>:                                V-AGR-OPT ;
! %<v%>%<tv%>:                                       V-DIR ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON V-SI-PRES 

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pres%>:                               V-AGR-PRES ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<pp%>:%>ni                             V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-SI-PRET

%<v%>%<tv%>%<pret%>:%{j%}%>%{k%}                   V-AGR-PRET ;
%<v%>%<tv%>%<plu%>:%{j%}%>ka                       V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON V-SI-IMPF

%<v%>%<tv%>%<impf%>:%>ya                           V-AGR-PRES ;

LEXICON SIO
namaka:namaka                                      V-SIO-PRES ; 
namaka:namaka                                      V-SIO-IMPF ;
namaka:namaka                                      V-SIO-PROG ;
namaka:namaka                                      V-SIO-PRET ; 
namaka:namaka                                      V-SIO-FUTR ; 
tilanilia:tilanilia                                V-SIO-PRES ; 
tilanilia:tilanilia                                V-SIO-IMPF ;
tilanilia:tilanilia                                V-SIO-PROG ;
tilanilia:tilanilia                                V-SIO-PRET ; 
tilanilia:tilanilia                                V-SIO-FUTR ; 
iluia:iluia                                       V-SIO-PRES ;
iluia:iluia                                       V-SIO-IMPF ;
iluia:ilui                                        V-SIO-PROG ;
iluia:ilui                                        V-SIO-PRET ;
iluia:ilui                                        V-SIO-FUTR ;
poxtalilia:pox%>talilia                 V-SIO-PRES ;
poxtalilia:pox%>talilia                 V-SIO-IMPF ;
poxtalilia:pox%>talili                  V-SIO-PROG ;
poxtalilia:pox%>talili                  V-SIO-PRET ;
poxtalilia:pox%>talili                  V-SIO-FUTR ;
kahuilia:kahuilia                                     V-SIO-PRES ; ! "dejarle"
kuiltia:kuiltia                                       V-SIO-PRES ; ! "atinarle"
kuiltia:kuiltia                                       V-SIO-IMPF ; ! "atinarle"
kuiltia:kuilti                                        V-SIO-PROG ; ! "atinarle"
kuiltia:kuilti                                        V-SIO-PRET ; ! "atinarle"
kuiltia:kuilti                                        V-SIO-FUTR ; ! "atinarle"
LEXICON SO
toka:toka                                           V-SO-PRES ;
toka:toka                                           V-SO-IMPF ;
toka:toka                                           V-SO-PROG ;
toka:toka                                           V-SO-PRET ;
toka:toka                                           V-SO-FUTR ;
majsehua:majsehua                                   V-SO-PRES ;
majsehua:majsehua                                   V-SO-IMPF ;
majsehua:majsehua                                   V-SO-PROG ;
majsehua:majsehua                                   V-SO-PRET ;
majsehua:majsehua                                   V-SO-FUTR ;
patanaltia:patanalti%{y%}a                          V-SO-PRES ;
patanaltia:patanalti%{y%}a                          V-SO-IMPF ;
patanaltia:patanalti                                V-SO-PROG ;
patanaltia:patanalti                                V-SO-PRET ;
patanaltia:patanalti                                V-SO-FUTR ;
pampilohua:pampilohua                               V-SO-PRES ;
pampilohua:pampilohua                               V-SO-IMPF ;
pampilohua:pampilohua                               V-SO-PROG ;
pampilohua:pampilo                                  V-SO-PRET ;
pampilohua:pampilo                                  V-SO-FUTR ;
ololchihua:ololchi                                  V-SO-PRET ;
yolmela:yolmela                                     V-SO-PRES ;
yolmela:yolmela                                     V-SO-IMPF ;
yolmela:yolmela                                     V-SO-PROG ;
yolmela:yolmela                                     V-SO-FUTR ;
LEXICON SI
servirohua:servirohua                               V-SI-PRES ;
servirohua:servirohua                               V-SI-IMPF ;
servirohua:servirohua                               V-SI-PRET ;
talilia:talilia                                     V-SI-PRES ;
talilia:talilia                                     V-SI-IMPF ;
talilia:talili                                      V-SI-PRET ;
tamota:tamota                                       V-SI-PRES ;
tamota:tamota                                       V-SI-IMPF ;
tamota:tamota                                       V-SI-PRET ;
tahuelia:tahuelia                                   V-SI-PRES ;
tahuelia:tahuelia                                   V-SI-IMPF ;
tahuelia:tahuelia                                   V-SI-PRET ;
takiltia:takilti%{y%}a                              V-SI-PRES ;
takiltia:takilti%{y%}a                              V-SI-IMPF ;
takiltia:takilti                                    V-SI-PRET ;
